en: Lamb heart
fr: Coeur d'agneau

en: Cooked lamb hearts
fr: Coeurs d'agneau cuits

en: Lamb liver
bg: Агнешки черен дроб
fr: Foie d'agneau
hr: Janjeća jetra

en: Cooked lamb liver
fr: Foie d'agneau cuit

en: Lamb kidneys
bg: Агнешки бъбреци
fr: Rognons d'agneau
hr: Janjeći bubrezi

en: Braised lamb kidneys
fr: Rognons d'agneau braisés

en: Roasted lamb shoulders, baked lamb shoulders
fr: Epaules rôties d'agneau, Epaules d'agneau cuites au four

en: Roasted lean lamb shoulders, Baked lean lamb shoulders
fr: Epaules d'agneau maigres rôties, Epaules d'agneau maigres cuites au four

en: Lamb shoulder
de: Lammschulter
fr: Epaule d'agneau
hr: Janjeća plećka

en: Lean lamb shoulder
fr: Epaule d'agneau maigre

en: Lamb breast
fr: Poitrine d'agneau

en: Frozen lamb breast
fr: Poitrine d'agneau surgelée

en: Lamb loin
fr: Longe d'agneau

en: Frozen lamb loin
fr: Longe d'agneau surgelée

en: Lamb carcass
fr: Carcasse d’agneau

en: Meals with lamb
de: Lammgerichte
es: Platos con cordero
fr: Plats à base d'agneau
hr: Jela s janjetinom

en: Stewed lamb garnished with potatoes and other vegetables
fr: Navarin d'agneau aux légumes

en: Bacon, Pork bacon
bg: Бекон, свински бекон
de: Speck, Schweinespeck
es: Bacon
fi: pekoni
fr: Bacon, lard, lardum, lard hypodermique, bardière
hr: Slanina
it: Bacon
ja: ベーコン
nl: Spek
pl: Boczek
ru: Бекон
sv: Bacon
zh: 培根, 猪培根, 猪肉培根

en: pig head
bg: свинска глава
de: Schweinekopf
es: cabeza de cerdo
fr: tête de porc
hr: Svinjska glava

en: Back bacon
fr: Filet de bacon
hr: Leđna slanina
nl: Ontbijtspek